Georgia, session 2025_26, HB625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating a State Court of Fulton County by consolidation of the existing Civil Court
of Fulton County and the Criminal Court of Fulton County, approved March 24, 1976 (Ga.
L. 1976, p. 3023), as amended, particularly by an Act approved March 24, 1994 (Ga. L.
H. B. 625
- 1 -

LC 47 3315/AP
1994, p. 3944), and by an Act approved May 14, 2003 (Ga. L. 2003, p. 3518), is amended
by adding at the end of subsection (b) of Section 6 a new paragraph to read as follows:
"Two additional judges are added to the State Court of Fulton County, thereby increasing
to 12 the number of judges of said court. Such judges shall be appointed by the Governor
as soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act for a term beginning on the date
of such appointment and expiring December 31, 2026, and until successors are elected and
qualified. Successors to the initial judges shall be elected in a manner provided by law for
the election of judges of the state courts of this state at the nonpartisan general election in
May 2026, for a term of four years beginning on January 1, 2027, and until their successors
are elected and qualified. They shall take office on January 1 following the date of the
election. Such elections shall be held and conducted in a manner provided for by law for
the election of judges of the state courts of this state. Said additional judges shall have and
may exercise all powers, duties, dignity, jurisdiction, privileges, and immunities of the
present judges of the State Court of Fulton County. The compensation, salary, and
contingent expense allowances of said additional judges shall be the same as that of the
other judges of the State Court of Fulton County. Any salary supplements heretofore
enacted by Fulton County shall also be applicable to the additional judges provided for in
this Act."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 625
- 2 -